North Carolina, session 2025, HB36.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The Department of Veterans and Military Affairs (hereafter
"Department") shall ensure that all four of the State's veterans cemeteries are staffed by
employees who are able to operate and maintain the cemeteries in a manner that honors the State's
veterans and their families. The Department shall identify and correct any issues at the State's
veterans cemeteries related to (i) undue delays in installing headstones, (ii) damage to headstones,
temporary markers, and graves caused by lawn equipment or vehicles, (iii) drainage and flooding
problems, (iv) scattered debris and other items, and (v) overall grounds appearance, including
bare patches due to lack of grass. In its efforts to comply with this section, the Department shall
permit auxiliary and active military groups and other fraternal organizations, including the
Veterans of Foreign Wars, the North Carolina National Guard, and the ROTC, to volunteer to
perform maintenance projects at the State's veterans cemeteries.
SECTION 1.(b) In order to better serve the families of our State's veterans, the
Department shall adjust its policies to accommodate family requests relating to funeral services.
The Department shall review its current policies and the reasons for those policies on the
following: (i) chapel only services, (ii) the time allotted for funeral services, (iii) the number of
attendees allowed to attend funeral services, and (iv) no visitation of grave sites while a funeral
is being held.
SECTION 2. By October 1, 2025, the Department shall submit a report of its findings
on (i) the issues set out in subsection (a) of Section 1 of this act and any changes made to address
those issues and (ii) any changes made to the policies listed in subsection (b) of Section 1 of this
act to the House and Senate Chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General
Government.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H36-v-1*